Colorado, session 2026A, HB1174.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) For the 2025-26 budget year, the actual funded pupil count and
the at-risk pupil count are lower than anticipated when the appropriation
was established in the 2025 regular legislative session for total program
funding for the 2025-26 budget year. As a result, total program is
$33,548,028 lower than anticipated when appropriations were established
in the 2025 regular legislative session.
(b) Based on the actual local property tax revenue and specific
ownership tax revenue available to school districts for the 2025-26 budget
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

year, the local share of total program funding is $69,924,480 higher than
anticipated when appropriations were established in the 2025 regular
legislative session.
(c) Therefore, the general assembly's intent is to decrease the state
share of districts' total program funding by $103,472,508 for the 2025-26
budget year.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-103.5, amend
(14)(a)(I) as follows:
22-54-103.5. District total program - rules - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(14) Total program funding.
(a) (I) For the 2025-26 budget year, the department of education and
the staff of the legislative council shall determine, based on budget
projections, the amount to ensure that for the 2025-26 budget year, the sum
of total program funding for all districts, including funding for institute
charter schools, is at least ten billion thirty-one million six hundred six
thousand ninety dollars ($10,031,606,090) NINE BILLION NINE HUNDRED
NINETY-EIGHT MILLION FIFTY-EIGHT THOUSAND SIXTY-THREE DOLLARS
($9,998,058,063); except that the department of education and the staff of
the legislative council shall make mid-year revisions to replace projections
with actual figures, including actual pupil enrollment, assessed valuations,
and specific ownership tax revenue from the prior year to determine any
necessary changes in the amount to maintain total program funding for the
applicable budget year.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-103.3, amend
(3)(a) as follows:
22-54-103.3. District total program - 2025-26 through 2030-31
budget years - definitions - repeal.
(3) (a) (I) For the 2025-26 budget year, a district's total program is
the greater of the district's total program determination for the 2024-25
budget year, or the amount calculated pursuant to section 22-54-104 plus an
amount equal to fifteen percent of the difference between the district's total
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1174

program calculation pursuant to section 22-54-103.5 and the district's total
program calculation pursuant to section 22-54-104.
(II) WHEN DETERMINING A DISTRICT'S TOTAL PROGRAM PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE DISTRICT'S TOTAL
PROGRAM CALCULATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-54-103.5 IS LESS THAN
THE DISTRICT'S TOTAL PROGRAM CALCULATION PURSUANT TO SECTION
22-54-104, THEN NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION,
THE DISTRICT'S TOTAL PROGRAM IS THE GREATER OF THE DISTRICT'S TOTAL
PROGRAM DETERMINATION FOR THE 2024-25 BUDGET YEAR OR THE AMOUNT
CALCULATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-54-104.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1174

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 4. Appropriation to the department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB
25-206), amend Part IV (3)(A), the affected totals, and footnote 11 as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART IV
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(3) SCHOOL DISTRICT OPERATIONS
(A) Public School Finance
Administration 2,471,809 2,210,618 261,191a
(16.0 FTE) (1.5 FTE)
Financial Transparency
System Maintenance 92,786 92,786a
(1.0 FTE)
School Finance Audit
Payments 3,000,000 3,000,000b
State Share of Districts'
Total Program Funding10 5,463,908,610 3,095,718,552 1,292,968,309c 1,075,221,749d
5,363,929,334 975,242,473d
Extended High School11 24,559,880 24,559,880a
21,066,648 21,066,648a
District Per Pupil
Reimbursements for
Juveniles Held in Jail 10,000 10,000b
At-risk Per Pupil
Additional Funding 5,000,000 5,000,000a
Contingency Reserve Fund 1,000,000 1,000,000e
5,500,043,085
5,396,570,577
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1174

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a These amounts shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b These amounts shall be from the State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S., from federal mineral leasing revenues transferred to the State Public School Fund
pursuant to Sections 22-54-114 (1) and 34-63-102, C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
d Of this amount, $1,004,554,817 $904,575,541 shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution and $70,666,932 shall be
from the State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from the State Education
Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution. Of the amount appropriated from the State Public School Fund,
$51,922,059 is estimated to be from federal mineral leasing revenues transferred to the State Public School Fund pursuant to Sections 22-54-114 (1) and 34-63-102, C.R.S., $16,217,517
is estimated to be from marijuana sales tax revenues transferred to the State Public School Fund pursuant to Section 39-28.8-203 (1)(b)(I.5)(B), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to
Section 22-54-139, C.R.S., and $2,527,356 is estimated to be from interest and income earned on the investment of money in the Public School Fund that is credited to the State Public
School Fund pursuant to Section 22-41-102 (3)(f), C.R.S.
e This amount shall be from the Contingency Reserve Fund created in Section 22-54-117 (1)(a), C.R.S.
TOTALS PART IV
(EDUCATION) $7,756,003,663 $3,418,629,265 $1,292,968,309a $2,139,481,573b $55,664,660c $849,259,856d
$7,652,531,155 $2,036,009,065b
a This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $9,800,097 contains an (I) notation.
c Of this amount, $43,900,000 contains an (I) notation.
d This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
11 Department of Education, School District Operations, Public School Finance, Extended High School -- Pursuant to section 22-35-108.5 (2)(b)(II), C.R.S.,
the purpose of this footnote is to specify what portion of this appropriation is intended to be available for the Teacher Recruitment Education and Preparation
(TREP) Program for the 2025-26 state fiscal year. It is the General Assembly's intent that the Department of Education be authorized to utilize up to $2,620,000
$2,263,680 of this appropriation to fund qualified students identified as TREP Program participants. This amount is calculated based on an estimated 250 216
FTE TREP Program participants funded at a rate of $10,480 per FTE pursuant to section 22-54-204 (4.7), C.R.S. SECTION 22-54-104 (4.7), C.R.S.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1174

SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1174